District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-4306

Annual financial statement — Forms to be furnished by Superintendent.

Repealed.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-42, § 7(b), 40 DCR 6020
1981 Ed., §§ 35-406, 35-407.
D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(i) ( 44 DCR 1730), eff. May 21, 1997, amends these sections subsequent to their repeal.